Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-384
Nonresident carnival operator; thirty-day
permit; fees; reciprocity.

Upon receipt of an application
duly verified, a nonresident carnival operator shall be issued a thirty-day
carnival operators' permit to operate in Nebraska upon the payment of the
following fees: For the gross vehicle weight of sixteen thousand pounds or
less, ten dollars; for more than sixteen thousand pounds and not more than
twenty-eight thousand pounds, fifteen dollars; for more than twenty-eight
thousand pounds and not more than forty thousand pounds, twenty dollars; and
for more than forty thousand pounds and not more than seventy-three thousand
two hundred eighty pounds, twenty-five dollars, except that such a permit
shall be issued only to out-of-state operators when the jurisdiction in which
the motor vehicle and trailer is registered grants reciprocity to Nebraska.
Such fees shall be paid to the county treasurer or persons designated
by the director, who shall have authority to issue the permit when the applicant
is eligible and pays the required fee. All fees collected under this section
shall be paid into the state treasury and by the State Treasurer credited
to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 84;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 56.
July 19, 2012